Hawaii, session 2025, GM1314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Hawaii has among the
highest rates of traffic related fatalities. The implementation
of photo red light imaging detector systems at intersections
with the most dangerous and highest risk transit infrastructure,
as well as photo speed detector systems in school zones with the
most dangerous and high-risk transit infrastructure, can help
prevent drivers from running red lights, and slow speeders in
key areas, to help reduce fatalities and injuries.
The legislature further finds that it should be a priority
to ensure dedicated funding necessary to support accelerating
improvements in the most dangerous transit corridors.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Establish a safe routes to school program vehicle
registration surcharge on certain motor vehicle
registrations, to be imposed and collected no later
than December 31, 2025;
2025-3460 HB1231 CDl HMSO 1

Page 2 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Prohibit the use of facial recognition software in the
operation of any photo red light imaging detector
system; and
(3) Clarify the summons and citations processes for the
automated speed enforcement systems program.
SECTION 2. Chapter 249, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§249- Safe routes to school program vehicle
registration surcharge. (a) In addition to any other fees
required by law, each county shall impose and collect a $5
surcharge on every motor vehicle registration issued under
section 249-31 or 249-31.5, no later than December 31, 2025.
(b) The director of finance shall notify the department of
transportation in writing of the county's intended start date at
least ninety days before implementing this section.
(c) The surcharge shall be deposited into the safe routes
to school program special fund established under section
291C-4."
2025-3460 HB1231 CDl HMSO 2
■BlinilHHIIIIHIIil

Page 3 1231
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. Chapter 291J, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§291J- Facial recognition software; prohibited. (a)
No photo red light imaging detector system authorized under this
chapter shall use or be equipped with facial recognition
software or biometric identification technology.
(b) This section shall not apply to:
(1) Automated license plate reader systems; or
(2) Any non-biometric technology used to verify vehicle
identity, registration status, or to generate
photographic evidence of a traffic violation.
(c) For the purposes of this section:
"Biometric identification" includes but is not limited to
recognition of facial features, iris scans, retinal scans,
fingerprints, or voice patterns.
"Facial recognition software" means technology that
analyzes facial features to identify or verify the identity of
an individual."
2025-3460 HB1231 CDl HMSO

Page 4 H.B. NO. E
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. Chapter 291L, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§291L- Facial recognition software; prohibited. (a)
No automated speed enforcement system authorized under this
chapter shall use or be equipped with facial recognition
software or biometric identification technology.
(b) This section shall not apply to:
(1) Automated license plate reader systems; or
(2) Any non-biometric technology used to verify vehicle
identity, registration status, or to generate
photographic evidence of a traffic violation.
(c) For the purposes of this section:
"Biometric identification” includes but is not limited to
recognition of facial features, iris scans, retinal scans,
fingerprints, or voice patterns.
"Facial recognition software" means technology that
analyzes facial features to identify or verify the identity of
an individual."
SECTION 5. Section 291C-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2025-3460 HB1231 GDI HMSO
liniiiMiiiiimiiiiiiii

Page 5 H.B. NO. S';
C.D. 1
"§291C-4 Safe routes to school program special fund;
establishment. There is established in the state treasury the
safe routes to school program special fund, into which shall be
deposited:
(1) Assessments collected for speeding in a school zone,
pursuant to section 291C-104; [and]
(2) Safe routes to school program surcharges collected in
accordance with sections 291-16 and 291C-5 [t-] ; and
(3) The surcharge collected pursuant to section 249-
SECTION 6. Section 291L-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t] §291L-5 [^] Summons or citation. (a) Notwithstanding
any law to the contrary and except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, beginning January 1, 2025, whenever any motor vehicle
is determined, by means of an automated speed enforcement
system, to have exceeded the posted maximum speed limit by not
less than five miles per hour in violation of section 291C-108,
the State's third-party contractor shall cause a summons or
citation, as described in this section, to be sent by first-
class mail [-7—that io postmarked within ten calendar days after
the date of ■■the incident, ] to the registered owner of the motor
2025-3460 HB1231 CDl HMSO

Page 6 1231
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
vehicle [at- the] The summons or citation shall be mailed to
the registered owner's address on record at the vehicle
licensing division[—] and submitted to the post office within
ten calendar days after the date of the incident. The State,
the county, or the State's or county's third-party contractor
shall implement a process to record the date on which the
summons or citation was submitted to the post office, and the
record shall be prlma facie evidence of the date the summons or
citation was submitted to the post office. If the end of the
ten-calendar-day period falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday,
then the ending period shall run until the end of the next day
that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday. The registered
owner shall be determined by the identification of the motor
vehicle license plate.
(b) The form and content of the summons or citation shall
be adopted or prescribed by the administrative judge of the
district courts and printed on a form commensurate with the form
of other summonses or citations used in modern methods of arrest
that are designed to include all necessary information to make
the summons or citation valid within the laws of the State;
provided that any summons or citation issued pursuant to the
2025-3460 HB1231 CDl HMSO

Page 7 H.B. NO. JS’i
C.D. 1
automated speed enforcement systems program shall contain a
clear and unobstructed photographic, digital, or other visual
image of the motor vehicle license plate, and speed units
measured by the speed reader that shall be used as evidence of
the violation.
(c) Every summons or citation shall be consecutively
numbered and each copy thereof shall bear the number of its
respective original.
(d) Before mailing the summons or citation for a traffic
infraction pursuant to subsection (a), the applicable county
police department shall review and verify the validity of the
clear and unobstructed photographic, digital, or other visual
image of the license plate of the motor vehicle required under
this section.
(e) Upon receipt of the summons or citation, the
registered owner shall respond as provided for in section
291D-6. A record of the mailing of the summons or citation
prepared in the ordinary course of business shall be priraa facie
evidence of notification.
(f) Procedures regarding answering a notice, court
actions, and court hearings shall be pursuant to sections
2025-3460 HB1231 CDl HMSO
iHiHiiniHiiniiiiiHn

Page 8 1231
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
291D-6, 291D-7, 291D-8, and 291D-13; provided that it shall not
be a defense to any citation issued pursuant to this chapter
that another person was driving the defendant's motor vehicle at
the time of incident, unless the motor vehicle was stolen as
documented by a police report; provided further that any
reference to the defendant's commission of the traffic
infraction or similar language shall be interpreted to mean
commission of the traffic infraction.
(g) Any summons or citations issued or convictions
resulting from this chapter shall not be recorded on a person's
traffic abstract and shall not be used for insurance purposes in
the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage."
SECTION 7. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3460 HB1231 CDi HMSO

1231
H.B. NO.
±
w
d
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 25th day of 'June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1231, HD 1, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
--------------
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1231, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai'i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
214